District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-4324

Hunting or disbursing of ducks, geese, and waterfowl

Repealed.

Aug. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 815, Pub. L. 85-730, § 8(a)-(d)

History

1981 Ed., §§ 22-1608 to 22-1627.

Prior Codifications